Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1410.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-13.1 of Title 2, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall operate an Ag in the Classroom Education Program for the
purpose of educating students about agriculture within this state.
B. The Ag in the Classroom Education Program shall:
1. Develop curriculum for students in grades kindergarten
through twelve for Ag in the Classroom programs in urban and rural
schools;

2. Provide training and workshops for teachers who utilize Ag
in the Classroom curriculum;
3. Utilize existing Department resources and related programs;
and
4. Cooperate with the State Department of Education and the
Oklahoma State University Oklahoma Cooperative Extension Service as
needed in development and operation of the program; provided,
however, the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
shall have sole authority over the program.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
may provide incentives if funds are available to teachers who
participate in the Ag in the Classroom Education Program and utilize
curriculum provided by the program. Teachers who complete
eligibility requirements for the incentives as promulgated by rules
of the State Board of Agriculture may receive incentives. The
incentives may include but not be limited to:
1. Teacher recognition in newsletters, the Ag in the Classroom
website, social media, or other methods of recognition for
completing eligibility requirements;
2. A monetary award to be used for agriculture-related class
projects or field trips;
3. Entering a teacher into a drawing for Ag in the Classroom
resources or other items; and
4. Awarding a teacher an Ag in the Classroom certificate.
D. The Department shall directly receive all funds provided for
the Ag in the Classroom Education Program pursuant to Section 1104.3
of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes. The Department may apply for,
accept, and use any gift, grant, or bequest from any source for the
purpose of discharging its duties.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. S. B. NO. 1410 Page 2

Passed the Senate the 26th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
Passed the House of Representatives the 6th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of __________________, 20 _______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. S. B. NO. 1410 Page 3